Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.600

Convention.

A "convention" for the purposes of this chapter , is an organized assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate or candidates or a new or minor political party, organization, or principle.

[ 2013 c 11 s 26; 2004 c 271 s 188. Formerly RCW 29A.20.111.]